Oklahoma, session 2025, SB359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12-103 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of Service


Oklahoma; and


2. “Open recall” means a safety-related recall, for which


notification by a manufacturer is required to be provided by federal


law, that necessitates repairs or modification to a motor vehicle by


an authorized motor vehicle dealer. For purposes of this section,


open recall shall not include:

Req. No. 1132 Page 1


a. recalls related to defects or failures to comply with


requirements relating to labeling or notification in a


motor vehicle owner’s manual, or


b. recalls for which the remedy is for the manufacturer


to repurchase the motor vehicle or otherwise provide


financial compensation to the owner of the vehicle.


B. Service Oklahoma may, prior to issuing a motor vehicle


registration or mailing a motor vehicle registration renewal notice,


check information made available by the National Highway Traffic


Safety Administration to determine whether the motor vehicle is


subject to an open recall. For a vehicle that is subject to one or


more open recalls, Service Oklahoma may provide the owner of the


motor vehicle written notice of all open recalls applicable to the


motor vehicle. The recall notice may be provided at the time the


vehicle is registered, except that for registrational renewals, the


recall notice may be included in the registration renewal notice.


The recall notice shall include the following:


1. A description of each open recall; and


2. A statement that each open recall may be repaired by a motor


vehicle dealer approved by the manufacturer of the motor vehicle at


no cost to the owner of the motor vehicle, except as provided in 49


U.S.C., Section 30120.





Req. No. 1132 Page 2


C. Nothing in this section shall alter the liability under law


of any motor vehicle manufacturer or motor vehicle dealer approved


by the manufacturer to repair an open recall.


D. The Executive Director, employees, or licensed operators


within Service Oklahoma who are designated by the Executive


Director, for the purposes of discharging their duties pursuant to


this section, shall not be liable to any person for any act or


omission related to the open recall notice provided pursuant to this


section, except for cases of gross negligence.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1132 MSBB 1/3/2025 4:33:57 PM

























Req. No. 1132 Page 3